Nebraska, session 109, LB131.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 68-1201, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-1201 (1) In determining eligibility for the program for aid to
dependent children pursuant to section 43-512 as administered by the
State of Nebraska pursuant to the federal Temporary Assistance for Needy
Families program, 42 U.S.C. 601 et seq., for the low-income home energy
assistance program administered by the State of Nebraska pursuant to the
federal Energy Policy Act of 2005, 42 U.S.C. 8621 to 8630, for the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program administered by the State of
Nebraska pursuant to the federal Food and Nutrition Act of 2008, 7 U.S.C.
2011 et seq., and for the child care subsidy program established pursuant
to section 68-1202, the following shall not be included in determining
assets or income:
(a) Assets in or income from an educational savings account, a
Coverdell educational savings account described in 26 U.S.C. 530, a
qualified tuition program established pursuant to 26 U.S.C. 529, or any
similar savings account or plan established to save for qualified higher
education expenses as defined in section 6 of this act 85-1802;
(b) Income from scholarships or grants related to postsecondary
education, whether merit-based, need-based, or a combination thereof;
(c) Income from postsecondary educational work-study programs,
whether federally funded, funded by a postsecondary educational
institution, or funded from any other source;
(d) Assets in or income from an account under a qualified program as
provided in section 77-1402;
(e) Income received for participation in grant-funded research on
the impact that income has on the development of children in low-income
families, except that such exclusion of income must not exceed four
thousand dollars per year for a maximum of eight years and such exclusion
shall only be made if the exclusion is permissible under federal law for
each program referenced in this section. No such exclusion shall be made
-2-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
for such income on or after December 31, 2026; and
(f) Income from any tax credits received pursuant to the School
Readiness Tax Credit Act.
(2) In determining eligibility for the program for aid to dependent
children pursuant to section 43-512 as administered by the State of
Nebraska pursuant to the federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families
program, 42 U.S.C. 601 et seq., passed-through child support as described
in section 43-512.07, shall not be included in determining assets or
income.
Sec. 2. Section 72-1239.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
72-1239.01 (1)(a) The appointed members of the council shall have
the responsibility for the investment management of the assets of the
retirement systems administered by the Public Employees Retirement Board
as provided in section 84-1503, the assets of the Nebraska educational
savings plan trust as provided in section 10 of this act created pursuant
to sections 85-1801 to 85-1817, the assets of the achieving a better life
experience program pursuant to sections 77-1401 to 77-1409, and beginning
January 1, 2017, the assets of each retirement system provided for under
the Class V School Employees Retirement Act. Except as provided in
subsection (4) of this section, the appointed members shall be deemed
fiduciaries with respect to the investment of the assets of the
retirement systems, of the Nebraska educational savings plan trust, and
of the achieving a better life experience program and shall be held to
the standard of conduct of a fiduciary specified in subsection (3) of
this section. The nonvoting, ex officio members of the council shall not
be deemed fiduciaries.
(b) As fiduciaries, the appointed members of the council and the
state investment officer shall discharge their duties with respect to the
assets of the retirement systems, of the Nebraska educational savings
plan trust, and of the achieving a better life experience program solely
-3-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
in the interests of the members and beneficiaries of the retirement
systems or the interests of the participants and beneficiaries of the
Nebraska educational savings plan trust and the achieving a better life
experience program, as the case may be, for the exclusive purposes of
providing benefits to members, members' beneficiaries, participants, and
participants' beneficiaries and defraying reasonable expenses incurred
within the limitations and according to the powers, duties, and purposes
prescribed by law.
(2)(a) The appointed members of the council shall have the
responsibility for the investment management of the assets of state
funds. The appointed members shall be deemed fiduciaries with respect to
the investment of the assets of state funds and shall be held to the
standard of conduct of a fiduciary specified in subsection (3) of this
section. The nonvoting, ex officio members of the council shall not be
deemed fiduciaries.
(b) As fiduciaries, the appointed members of the council and the
state investment officer shall discharge their duties with respect to the
assets of state funds solely in the interests of the citizens of the
state within the limitations and according to the powers, duties, and
purposes prescribed by law.
(3) The appointed members of the council shall act with the care,
skill, prudence, and diligence under the circumstances then prevailing
that a prudent person acting in like capacity and familiar with such
matters would use in the conduct of an enterprise of a like character and
with like aims by diversifying the investments of the assets of the
retirement systems, the Nebraska educational savings plan trust, the
achieving a better life experience program, and state funds so as to
minimize risk of large losses, unless in light of such circumstances it
is clearly prudent not to do so. No assets of the retirement systems, the
Nebraska educational savings plan trust, or the achieving a better life
experience program shall be invested or reinvested if the sole or primary
-4-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
investment objective is for economic development or social purposes or
objectives.
(4) Neither the appointed members of the council nor the state
investment officer shall be deemed fiduciaries with respect to
investments of the assets of a retirement system provided for under the
Class V School Employees Retirement Act made by or on behalf of the board
of education as defined in section 79-978 or the board of trustees
provided for in section 79-980. Neither the council nor any member
thereof nor the state investment officer shall be liable for the action
or inaction of the board of education or the board of trustees with
respect to the investment of the assets of a retirement system provided
for under the Class V School Employees Retirement Act, the consequences
of any such action or inaction of the board of education or the board of
trustees, and any claims, suits, losses, damages, fees, and costs related
to such action or inaction or consequences thereof.
Sec. 3. Section 77-3,110, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3,110 (1) All funds received pursuant to sections 77-3,109 and
77-3,118 shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Department of Revenue Miscellaneous Receipts Fund which is hereby
created.
(2) On or before September 1, 2020, the State Treasurer shall
transfer fifty-nine thousand five hundred dollars from the College
Savings Plan Expense Fund to the Department of Revenue Miscellaneous
Receipts Fund.
(2) (3) All money in the Department of Revenue Miscellaneous
Receipts Fund shall be administered by the Department of Revenue and
shall be used as follows: (a) Any money transferred to the fund under
subsection (2) of this section shall be used by the Department of Revenue
to defray the costs incurred to implement Laws 2020, LB1042; and (b) All
other funds shall be used to defray the cost of production of the
-5-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
publications listed in section 77-3,109 or of the listings described in
section 77-3,118 and to carry out any administrative responsibilities of
the department.
(3) (4) Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at
the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Department of Revenue
Miscellaneous Receipts Fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion
Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 4. Section 77-2716, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2716 (1) The following adjustments to federal adjusted gross
income or, for corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall
be made for interest or dividends received:
(a)(i) There shall be subtracted interest or dividends received by
the owner of obligations of the United States and its territories and
possessions or of any authority, commission, or instrumentality of the
United States to the extent includable in gross income for federal income
tax purposes but exempt from state income taxes under the laws of the
United States; and
(ii) There shall be subtracted interest received by the owner of
obligations of the State of Nebraska or its political subdivisions or
authorities which are Build America Bonds to the extent includable in
gross income for federal income tax purposes;
(b) There shall be subtracted that portion of the total dividends
and other income received from a regulated investment company which is
attributable to obligations described in subdivision (a) of this
subsection as reported to the recipient by the regulated investment
company;
(c) There shall be added interest or dividends received by the owner
of obligations of the District of Columbia, other states of the United
States, or their political subdivisions, authorities, commissions, or
-6-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
instrumentalities to the extent excluded in the computation of gross
income for federal income tax purposes except that such interest or
dividends shall not be added if received by a corporation which is a
regulated investment company;
(d) There shall be added that portion of the total dividends and
other income received from a regulated investment company which is
attributable to obligations described in subdivision (c) of this
subsection and excluded for federal income tax purposes as reported to
the recipient by the regulated investment company; and
(e)(i) Any amount subtracted under this subsection shall be reduced
by any interest on indebtedness incurred to carry the obligations or
securities described in this subsection or the investment in the
regulated investment company and by any expenses incurred in the
production of interest or dividend income described in this subsection to
the extent that such expenses, including amortizable bond premiums, are
deductible in determining federal taxable income.
(ii) Any amount added under this subsection shall be reduced by any
expenses incurred in the production of such income to the extent
disallowed in the computation of federal taxable income.
(2) There shall be allowed a net operating loss derived from or
connected with Nebraska sources computed under rules and regulations
adopted and promulgated by the Tax Commissioner consistent, to the extent
possible under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, with the laws of the
United States. For a resident individual, estate, or trust, the net
operating loss computed on the federal income tax return shall be
adjusted by the modifications contained in this section. For a
nonresident individual, estate, or trust or for a partial-year resident
individual, the net operating loss computed on the federal return shall
be adjusted by the modifications contained in this section and any
carryovers or carrybacks shall be limited to the portion of the loss
derived from or connected with Nebraska sources.
-7-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
(3) There shall be subtracted from federal adjusted gross income for
all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1987, the amount of
any state income tax refund to the extent such refund was deducted under
the Internal Revenue Code, was not allowed in the computation of the tax
due under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, and is included in federal
adjusted gross income.
(4) Federal adjusted gross income, or, for a fiduciary, federal
taxable income shall be modified to exclude the portion of the income or
loss received from a small business corporation with an election in
effect under subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code or from a limited
liability company organized pursuant to the Nebraska Uniform Limited
Liability Company Act that is not derived from or connected with Nebraska
sources as determined in section 77-2734.01.
(5) There shall be subtracted from federal adjusted gross income or,
for corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income dividends
received or deemed to be received from corporations which are not subject
to the Internal Revenue Code.
(6) There shall be subtracted from federal taxable income a portion
of the income earned by a corporation subject to the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986 that is actually taxed by a foreign country or one of its
political subdivisions at a rate in excess of the maximum federal tax
rate for corporations. The taxpayer may make the computation for each
foreign country or for groups of foreign countries. The portion of the
taxes that may be deducted shall be computed in the following manner:
(a) The amount of federal taxable income from operations within a
foreign taxing jurisdiction shall be reduced by the amount of taxes
actually paid to the foreign jurisdiction that are not deductible solely
because the foreign tax credit was elected on the federal income tax
return;
(b) The amount of after-tax income shall be divided by one minus the
maximum tax rate for corporations in the Internal Revenue Code; and
-8-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
(c) The result of the calculation in subdivision (b) of this
subsection shall be subtracted from the amount of federal taxable income
used in subdivision (a) of this subsection. The result of such
calculation, if greater than zero, shall be subtracted from federal
taxable income.
(7) Federal adjusted gross income shall be modified to exclude any
amount repaid by the taxpayer for which a reduction in federal tax is
allowed under section 1341(a)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(8)(a) Federal adjusted gross income or, for corporations and
fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall be reduced, to the extent
included, by income from interest, earnings, and state contributions
received from the Nebraska educational savings plan trust as provided
created in sections 5 85-1801 to 20 of this act 85-1817 and any account
established under the achieving a better life experience program as
provided in sections 77-1401 to 77-1409.
(b) Federal adjusted gross income or, for corporations and
fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall be reduced by any contributions
as a participant in the Nebraska educational savings plan trust or
contributions to an account established under the achieving a better life
experience program made for the benefit of a beneficiary as provided in
sections 77-1401 to 77-1409, to the extent not deducted for federal
income tax purposes, but not to exceed five thousand dollars per married
filing separate return or ten thousand dollars for any other return. With
respect to a qualified rollover within the meaning of section 529 of the
Internal Revenue Code from another state's plan, any interest, earnings,
and state contributions received from the other state's educational
savings plan which is qualified under section 529 of the code shall
qualify for the reduction provided in this subdivision. For contributions
by a custodian of a custodial account including rollovers from another
custodial account, the reduction shall only apply to funds added to the
custodial account after January 1, 2014.
-9-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
(c) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2021, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income shall be reduced, to the extent included in
the adjusted gross income of an individual, by the amount of any
contribution made by the individual's employer into an account under the
Nebraska educational savings plan trust owned by the individual, not to
exceed five thousand dollars per married filing separate return or ten
thousand dollars for any other return.
(d) Federal adjusted gross income or, for corporations and
fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall be increased by:
(i) The amount resulting from the cancellation of a participation
agreement refunded to the taxpayer as a participant in the Nebraska
educational savings plan trust to the extent previously deducted under
subdivision (8)(b) of this section; and
(ii) The amount of any withdrawals by the owner of an account
established under the achieving a better life experience program as
provided in sections 77-1401 to 77-1409 for nonqualified expenses to the
extent previously deducted under subdivision (8)(b) of this section.
(9)(a) For income tax returns filed after September 10, 2001, for
taxable years beginning or deemed to begin before January 1, 2006, under
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, federal adjusted gross
income or, for corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall
be increased by eighty-five percent of any amount of any federal bonus
depreciation received under the federal Job Creation and Worker
Assistance Act of 2002 or the federal Jobs and Growth Tax Act of 2003,
under section 168(k) or section 1400L of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended, for assets placed in service after September 10, 2001,
and before December 31, 2005.
(b) For a partnership, limited liability company, cooperative,
including any cooperative exempt from income taxes under section 521 of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, limited cooperative
-10-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
association, subchapter S corporation, or joint venture, the increase
shall be distributed to the partners, members, shareholders, patrons, or
beneficiaries in the same manner as income is distributed for use against
their income tax liabilities.
(c) For a corporation with a unitary business having activity both
inside and outside the state, the increase shall be apportioned to
Nebraska in the same manner as income is apportioned to the state by
section 77-2734.05.
(d) The amount of bonus depreciation added to federal adjusted gross
income or, for corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income by
this subsection shall be subtracted in a later taxable year. Twenty
percent of the total amount of bonus depreciation added back by this
subsection for tax years beginning or deemed to begin before January 1,
2003, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, may be
subtracted in the first taxable year beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2005, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, and twenty percent in each of the next four following taxable
years. Twenty percent of the total amount of bonus depreciation added
back by this subsection for tax years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2003, may be subtracted in the first taxable year
beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2006, under the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and twenty percent in each of
the next four following taxable years.
(10) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2003, and before January 1, 2006, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, federal adjusted gross income or, for
corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall be increased
by the amount of any capital investment that is expensed under section
179 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, that is in excess
of twenty-five thousand dollars that is allowed under the federal Jobs
and Growth Tax Act of 2003. Twenty percent of the total amount of
-11-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
expensing added back by this subsection for tax years beginning or deemed
to begin on or after January 1, 2003, may be subtracted in the first
taxable year beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2006,
under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and twenty percent
in each of the next four following tax years.
(11)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin before
January 1, 2018, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income shall be reduced by contributions, up to
two thousand dollars per married filing jointly return or one thousand
dollars for any other return, and any investment earnings made as a
participant in the Nebraska long-term care savings plan under the Long-
Term Care Savings Plan Act, to the extent not deducted for federal income
tax purposes.
(b) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin before January 1,
2018, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, federal
adjusted gross income shall be increased by the withdrawals made as a
participant in the Nebraska long-term care savings plan under the act by
a person who is not a qualified individual or for any reason other than
transfer of funds to a spouse, long-term care expenses, long-term care
insurance premiums, or death of the participant, including withdrawals
made by reason of cancellation of the participation agreement, to the
extent previously deducted as a contribution or as investment earnings.
(12) There shall be added to federal adjusted gross income for
individuals, estates, and trusts any amount taken as a credit for
franchise tax paid by a financial institution under sections 77-3801 to
77-3807 as allowed by subsection (5) of section 77-2715.07.
(13)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2015, and before January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, federal adjusted gross income shall be reduced
by the amount received as benefits under the federal Social Security Act
which are included in the federal adjusted gross income if:
-12-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
(i) For taxpayers filing a married filing joint return, federal
adjusted gross income is fifty-eight thousand dollars or less; or
(ii) For taxpayers filing any other return, federal adjusted gross
income is forty-three thousand dollars or less.
(b) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, the Tax Commissioner shall adjust the dollar
amounts provided in subdivisions (13)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section by
the same percentage used to adjust individual income tax brackets under
subsection (3) of section 77-2715.03.
(c) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, a taxpayer may claim the reduction to federal
adjusted gross income allowed under this subsection or the reduction to
federal adjusted gross income allowed under subsection (14) of this
section, whichever provides the greater reduction.
(14)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2021, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income shall be reduced by a percentage of the
social security benefits that are received and included in federal
adjusted gross income. The pertinent percentage shall be:
(i) Five percent for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on
or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2022, under the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(ii) Forty percent for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on
or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2023, under the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(iii) Sixty percent for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin
on or after January 1, 2023, and before January 1, 2024, under the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and
(iv) One hundred percent for taxable years beginning or deemed to
-13-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
begin on or after January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, social security benefits means
benefits received under the federal Social Security Act.
(c) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, a taxpayer may claim the reduction to federal
adjusted gross income allowed under this subsection or the reduction to
federal adjusted gross income allowed under subsection (13) of this
section, whichever provides the greater reduction.
(15)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2015, and before January 1, 2022, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, an individual may make a one-time election
within two calendar years after the date of his or her retirement from
the military to exclude income received as a military retirement benefit
by the individual to the extent included in federal adjusted gross income
and as provided in this subdivision. The individual may elect to exclude
forty percent of his or her military retirement benefit income for seven
consecutive taxable years beginning with the year in which the election
is made or may elect to exclude fifteen percent of his or her military
retirement benefit income for all taxable years beginning with the year
in which he or she turns sixty-seven years of age.
(b) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2022, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an
individual may exclude one hundred percent of the military retirement
benefit income received by such individual to the extent included in
federal adjusted gross income.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, military retirement benefit
means retirement benefits that are periodic payments attributable to
service in the uniformed services of the United States for personal
services performed by an individual prior to his or her retirement. The
-14-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
term includes retirement benefits described in this subdivision that are
reported to the individual on either:
(i) An Internal Revenue Service Form 1099-R received from the United
States Department of Defense; or
(ii) An Internal Revenue Service Form 1099-R received from the
United States Office of Personnel Management.
(16) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2021, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income shall be reduced by the amount received as
a Segal AmeriCorps Education Award, to the extent such amount is included
in federal adjusted gross income.
(17) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2022, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income shall be reduced by the amount received by
or on behalf of a firefighter for cancer benefits under the Firefighter
Cancer Benefits Act to the extent included in federal adjusted gross
income.
(18) There shall be subtracted from the federal adjusted gross
income of individuals any amount received by the individual as student
loan repayment assistance under the Teach in Nebraska Today Act, to the
extent such amount is included in federal adjusted gross income.
(19) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2023, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, a
retired individual who was employed full time as a firefighter or
certified law enforcement officer for at least twenty years and who is at
least sixty years of age as of the end of the taxable year may reduce his
or her federal adjusted gross income by the amount of health insurance
premiums paid by such individual during the taxable year, to the extent
such premiums were not already deducted in determining the individual's
federal adjusted gross income.
(20) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
-15-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an
individual may reduce his or her federal adjusted gross income by the
amounts received as annuities under the Civil Service Retirement System
which were earned for being employed by the federal government, to the
extent such amounts are included in federal adjusted gross income.
(21) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2025, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an
individual who is a member of the Nebraska National Guard may exclude one
hundred percent of the income received from any of the following sources
to the extent such income is included in the individual's federal
adjusted gross income:
(a) Serving in a 32 U.S.C. duty status such as members attending
drills, annual training, and military schools and members who are serving
in a 32 U.S.C. active guard reserve or active duty for operational
support duty status;
(b) Employment as a 32 U.S.C. federal dual-status technician with
the Nebraska National Guard; or
(c) Serving in a state active duty status.
(22)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an
individual may reduce his or her federal adjusted gross income by the
amount of interest and principal balance of medical debt discharged under
the Medical Debt Relief Act, to the extent included in such individual's
federal adjusted gross income.
(b) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income or, for corporations and fiduciaries,
federal taxable income shall be reduced by the amount of contributions
made to the Medical Debt Relief Fund, to the extent not deducted for
federal income tax purposes.
(23) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
-16-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
January 1, 2025, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an
individual who is a qualifying employee as defined in section 77-3108 may
reduce his or her federal adjusted gross income by the amount allowed
under section 77-3111.
(24) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2026, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income or, for corporations and fiduciaries,
federal taxable income shall be reduced by the amounts allowed to be
deducted pursuant to section 77-27,242.
(25) There shall be added to federal adjusted gross income or, for
corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income for all taxable
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the amount of any net
capital loss that is derived from the sale or exchange of gold or silver
bullion to the extent such loss is included in federal adjusted gross
income except that such loss shall not be added if the loss is derived
from the sale of bullion as a taxable distribution from any retirement
plan account that holds gold or silver bullion. For the purposes of this
subsection, bullion has the same meaning as in section 77-2704.66.
(26) There shall be subtracted from federal adjusted gross income
or, for corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income for all
taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the amount of any
net capital gain that is derived from the sale or exchange of gold or
silver bullion to the extent such gain is included in federal adjusted
gross income except that such gain shall not be subtracted if the gain is
derived from the sale of bullion as a taxable distribution from any
retirement plan account that holds gold or silver bullion. For the
purposes of this subsection, bullion has the same meaning as in section
77-2704.66.
Sec. 5. Section 85-1801, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-1801 The Legislature finds that the general welfare and well-
-17-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
being of the state are directly related to educational levels and skills
of the citizens of the state and that a vital and valid public purpose is
served by the creation and implementation of programs which encourage and
make possible the attainment of higher levels of education by the
greatest number of citizens of the state. The state has limited resources
to provide additional programs for higher education funding and the
continued operation and maintenance of the state's public institutions of
elementary, secondary, and postsecondary higher education, and the
general welfare of the citizens of the state will be enhanced by
establishing a program which allows parents and others interested in the
higher education of our youth to invest money in a public trust for
future application to the payment of qualified higher education expenses.
The creation of the means of encouragement for persons to invest in such
a program represents the carrying out of a vital and valid public
purpose. In order to make available to parents and others interested in
the higher education of our youth an opportunity to fund future higher
education needs, it is necessary that a public trust be established in
which money may be invested for future educational use.
Sec. 6. Section 85-1802, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-1802 For purposes of sections 5 85-1801 to 20 of this act
85-1817:
(1) Administrative fund means the Education College Savings Plan
Administrative Fund created in section 10 of this act 85-1807;
(2) Beneficiary means the individual designated by a participation
agreement to benefit from advance payments of qualified higher education
expenses on behalf of the beneficiary;
(3) Benefits means the payment of qualified higher education
expenses on behalf of a beneficiary or, in the case of a qualified
education loan payment, on behalf of a beneficiary or the sibling of a
beneficiary by the Nebraska educational savings plan trust;
-18-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
(4) Eligible postsecondary educational institution means an
institution described in 20 U.S.C. 1088 which is eligible to participate
in a program under Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965;
(5) Expense fund means the Education College Savings Plan Expense
Fund created in section 10 of this act 85-1807;
(6) Nebraska educational savings plan trust means the trust created
in section 7 of this act 85-1804;
(7) Nonqualified withdrawal refers to (a) a distribution from an
account to the extent it is not used to pay the qualified higher
education expenses of the beneficiary or, in the case of a qualified
education loan payment, to the extent it is not used to pay the qualified
higher education expenses of the beneficiary or a sibling of the
beneficiary or to the extent it does not constitute a rollover to a Roth
individual retirement account as permitted by section 529 of the Internal
Revenue Code , or (b) a qualified rollover permitted by section 529 of
the Internal Revenue Code where the funds are transferred to a qualified
tuition program sponsored by another state or entity , or (c) a
distribution from an account to pay the costs of attending kindergarten
through grade twelve;
(8) Participant or account owner means an individual, an
individual's legal representative, or any other legal entity authorized
to establish a savings account under section 529 of the Internal Revenue
Code who has entered into a participation agreement for the advance
payment of qualified higher education expenses on behalf of a
beneficiary. For purposes of section 77-2716, as to contributions by a
custodian to a custodial account established pursuant to the Nebraska
Uniform Transfers to Minors Act or similar law in another state, which
account has been established under a participation agreement, participant
includes the parent or guardian of a minor, which parent or guardian is
also the custodian of the account;
(9) Participation agreement means an agreement between a participant
-19-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
and the Nebraska educational savings plan trust entered into under
sections 5 85-1801 to 20 of this act 85-1817;
(10) Program fund means the Education College Savings Plan Program
Fund created in section 10 of this act 85-1807;
(11) Qualified education loan payment means the payment of principal
or interest on a qualified education loan as defined in 26 U.S.C. 221(d),
as such section existed on January 1, 2022, of the beneficiary or a
sibling of the beneficiary as described in 26 U.S.C. 152(d)(2)(B), as
such section existed on January 1, 2022. For purposes of this
subdivision, the aggregate total of qualified education loan payments for
the qualified education loans of a single beneficiary or sibling shall
not exceed ten thousand dollars for all taxable years combined. The
aggregate total for qualified education loan payments for the qualified
education loans of a sibling of a beneficiary shall be calculated with
respect to such sibling and not with respect to the beneficiary and shall
include all qualified education loan payments for loans of such sibling,
including any qualified education loan payments for which such sibling is
the beneficiary or the sibling of a beneficiary;
(12)(a) (12) Qualified higher education expenses means:
(i) The the certified costs of tuition, and fees, books, supplies,
and equipment required (A) (a) for enrollment or attendance at an
eligible postsecondary educational institution or (B) (b) for costs
incurred on or after January 1, 2021, for participation in an
apprenticeship program registered and certified with the United States
Secretary of Labor under 29 U.S.C. 50, as such section existed on January
1, 2021; .
(ii) Reasonable room and board expenses, based on the minimum amount
applicable for the eligible postsecondary educational institution during
the period of enrollment , shall be included as qualified higher
education expenses for those students enrolled on at least a half-time
basis; .
-20-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
(iii) In the case of a special needs beneficiary, expenses for
special needs services incurred in connection with enrollment or
attendance at an eligible postsecondary educational institution; shall be
included as qualified higher education expenses.
(iv) Expenses paid or incurred on or after January 1, 2022, for the
purchase of computer technology or equipment or Internet access and
related services in connection with enrollment or attendance at an
eligible postsecondary educational institution, subject to the
limitations set forth in section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code; ,
shall be included as qualified higher education expenses.
(v) Qualified higher education expenses includes qualified education
loan payments; or .
(vi) Expenses for tuition in connection with enrollment or
attendance at an elementary or secondary school but does not include any
amounts in excess of ten thousand dollars per beneficiary per taxable
year.
(b) Qualified higher education expenses does not include any amounts
in excess of those allowed by section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(13) Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code means such section of
the code and the regulations interpreting such section; and
(14) Tuition and fees means:
(a) For purposes of an elementary or secondary school, the charges
imposed for tuition in connection with enrollment or attendance at such
elementary or secondary school; and
(b) For purposes of an eligible postsecondary educational
institution, the quarter or semester charges imposed to attend an
eligible postsecondary educational institution.
Sec. 7. Section 85-1804, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-1804 The Nebraska educational savings plan trust is created. The
State Treasurer is the trustee of the trust and as such is responsible
-21-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
for the administration, operation, and maintenance of the program and has
all powers necessary to carry out and effectuate the purposes,
objectives, and provisions of sections 5 85-1801 to 20 of this act
85-1817 pertaining to the administration, operation, and maintenance of
the trust and program, except that the state investment officer shall
have fiduciary responsibility to make all decisions regarding the
investment of the money in the administrative fund, expense fund, and
program fund, including the selection of all investment options and the
approval of all fees and other costs charged to trust assets except costs
for administration, operation, and maintenance of the trust as
appropriated by the Legislature, pursuant to the directions, guidelines,
and policies established by the Nebraska Investment Council. The State
Treasurer may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to provide for
the efficient administration, operation, and maintenance of the trust and
program. The State Treasurer shall not adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations that in any way interfere with the fiduciary responsibility
of the state investment officer to make all decisions regarding the
investment of money in the administrative fund, expense fund, and program
fund. The State Treasurer or his or her designee shall have the power to:
(1) Enter into agreements with any elementary or secondary school or
eligible postsecondary educational institution, the state, any federal or
other state agency, or any other entity to implement sections 5 85-1801
to 20 of this act 85-1817, except agreements which pertain to the
investment of money in the administrative fund, expense fund, or program
fund;
(2) Carry out the duties and obligations of the trust;
(3) Carry out studies and projections to advise participants
regarding present and estimated future qualified higher education
expenses and levels of financial participation in the trust required in
order to enable participants to achieve their educational funding
objectives;
-22-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
(4) Participate in any federal, state, or local governmental program
for the benefit of the trust;
(5) Procure insurance against any loss in connection with the
property, assets, or activities of the trust as provided in section
81-8,239.01;
(6) Enter into participation agreements with participants;
(7) Make payments to elementary or secondary schools or eligible
postsecondary educational institutions pursuant to participation
agreements on behalf of beneficiaries and make qualified education loan
payments on behalf of beneficiaries or their siblings;
(8) Make distributions to participants upon the termination of
participation agreements pursuant to the provisions, limitations, and
restrictions set forth in sections 5 85-1801 to 20 of this act 85-1817;
(9) Contract for goods and services and engage personnel as
necessary, including consultants, actuaries, managers, legal counsels,
and auditors for the purpose of rendering professional, managerial, and
technical assistance and advice regarding trust administration and
operation, except contracts which pertain to the investment of the
administrative, expense, or program funds; and
(10) Establish, impose, and collect administrative fees and charges
in connection with transactions of the trust, and provide for reasonable
service charges, including penalties for cancellations and late payments
with respect to participation agreements.
The Nebraska Investment Council may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to provide for the prudent investment of the assets of the
trust. The council or its designee also has the authority to select and
enter into agreements with individuals and entities to provide investment
advice and management of the assets held by the trust, establish
investment guidelines, objectives, and performance standards with respect
to the assets held by the trust, and approve any fees, commissions, and
expenses, which directly or indirectly affect the return on assets.
-23-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
Sec. 8. Section 85-1805, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-1805 Any advertising or promotional materials relating to the
Nebraska educational savings plan trust may include references to a
public office but shall not refer to an officeholder by name.
Sec. 9. Section 85-1806, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-1806 The Nebraska educational savings plan trust may enter into
participation agreements with participants on behalf of beneficiaries
pursuant to the following terms and conditions:
(1) A participation agreement shall authorize a participant to make
contributions to an account which is established for the purpose of
meeting the qualified higher education expenses of a beneficiary as
allowed by section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code. A participant shall
not be required to make an annual contribution on behalf of a
beneficiary, shall not be subject to minimum contribution requirements,
and shall not be required to maintain a minimum account balance. The
maximum contribution shall not exceed the amount allowed under section
529 of the Internal Revenue Code. The State Treasurer may set a maximum
cumulative contribution, as necessary, to maintain compliance with
section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code. Participation agreements may be
amended to provide for adjusted levels of contributions based upon
changed circumstances or changes in educational plans or to ensure
compliance with section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code or any other
applicable laws and regulations;
(2) Beneficiaries designated in participation agreements shall meet
the requirements established by the trustee and section 529 of the
Internal Revenue Code;
(3) Payment of benefits provided under participation agreements
shall be made in a manner consistent with section 529 of the Internal
Revenue Code;
-24-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
(4) The execution of a participation agreement by the trust shall
not guarantee in any way that qualified higher education expenses will be
equal to projections and estimates provided by the trust or that the
beneficiary named in any participation agreement will (a) be admitted to
an elementary or secondary school or eligible postsecondary educational
institution, (b) if admitted, be determined a resident for tuition
purposes by the elementary or secondary school or eligible postsecondary
educational institution, (c) be allowed to continue attendance at the
elementary or secondary school or eligible postsecondary educational
institution following admission, or (d) graduate from the elementary or
secondary school or eligible postsecondary educational institution;
(5) A beneficiary under a participation agreement may be changed as
permitted under the rules and regulations adopted under sections 5
85-1801 to 20 of this act 85-1817 and consistent with section 529 of the
Internal Revenue Code upon written request of the participant as long as
the substitute beneficiary is eligible for participation. Participation
agreements may otherwise be freely amended throughout their term in order
to enable participants to increase or decrease the level of
participation, change the designation of beneficiaries, and carry out
similar matters as authorized by rule and regulation; and
(6) Each participation agreement shall provide that the
participation agreement may be canceled upon the terms and conditions and
upon payment of applicable fees and costs set forth and contained in the
rules and regulations.
Sec. 10. Section 85-1807, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-1807 (1) The State Treasurer shall deposit money received by the
Nebraska educational savings plan trust into three funds: The Education
College Savings Plan Program Fund, the Education College Savings Plan
Expense Fund, and the Education College Savings Plan Administrative Fund.
The State Treasurer shall deposit money received by the trust into the
-25-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
appropriate fund. The State Treasurer and Accounting Administrator of the
Department of Administrative Services shall determine the state fund
types necessary to comply with section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code
and state policy. The money in the funds shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to policies established by the Nebraska
Investment Council. The program fund, the expense fund, and the
administrative fund shall be separately administered. The Nebraska
educational savings plan trust shall be operated with no General Fund
appropriations.
(2) The Education College Savings Plan Program Fund is created. All
money paid in connection with participation agreements and all investment
income earned on such money shall be deposited as received into separate
accounts within the program fund. Contributions to the trust may only be
made in the form of cash. All funds generated in connection with
participation agreements shall be deposited into the appropriate accounts
within the program fund. A participant or beneficiary shall not provide
investment direction regarding program contributions or earnings held by
the trust. Money accrued in the program fund may be used for the benefit
of a beneficiary for payments to any elementary or secondary school or
eligible postsecondary educational institution , but shall not be used to
pay expenses associated with attending kindergarten through grade twelve.
Any money in the program fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(3) The Education College Savings Plan Administrative Fund is
created. Money from the trust transferred from the expense fund to the
administrative fund in an amount authorized by an appropriation from the
Legislature shall be utilized to pay for the costs of administering,
operating, and maintaining the trust, to the extent permitted by section
529 of the Internal Revenue Code. The administrative fund shall not be
credited with any money other than money transferred from the expense
-26-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
fund in an amount authorized by an appropriation by the Legislature or
any interest income earned on the balances held in the administrative
fund. Any money in the administrative fund available for investment shall
be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(4)(a) The Education College Savings Plan Expense Fund is created.
The expense fund shall be funded with fees assessed to the program fund.
The State Treasurer shall use the expense fund:
(i) To pay costs associated with the Nebraska educational savings
plan trust; and
(ii) For the purposes described in the Meadowlark Act;
(iii) On or before September 1, 2020, to transfer from the expense
fund to the Department of Revenue Miscellaneous Receipts Fund fifty-nine
thousand five hundred dollars to defray the costs incurred to implement
Laws 2020, LB1042; and
(iii) (iv) To transfer from the expense fund to the State Investment
Officer's Cash Fund an amount equal to the pro rata share of the budget
appropriated to the Nebraska Investment Council as permitted in section
72-1249.02, to cover reasonable expenses incurred for investment
management of the Nebraska educational savings plan trust. Annually and
prior to such transfer to the State Investment Officer's Cash Fund, the
State Treasurer shall report to the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services and to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst the amounts
transferred during the previous fiscal year. The report submitted to the
Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall be submitted electronically.
(b) Any money in the expense fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 11. Section 85-1808, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-1808 (1) A participant may cancel a participation agreement at
-27-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
will by submitting a request to terminate the participation agreement.
Additionally, if a participant requests and obtains a nonqualified
withdrawal, the participation agreement shall be deemed canceled with
respect to the amount of the nonqualified withdrawal. A participation
agreement shall not be deemed canceled if a participant requests and
obtains a distribution of his or her entire account balance for qualified
higher education expenses and subsequently closes his or her account.
Furthermore, the State Treasurer shall have the power to terminate,
freeze, or suspend a participation agreement if he or she determines that
the participant provided false or misleading information to the detriment
of the Nebraska educational savings plan trust, if the participant's
account has a zero balance, or if the State Treasurer is unable to verify
the identity of the participant.
(2) If a participation agreement is canceled for any of the causes
listed in this subsection, the participant shall be entitled to receive
the principal amount of all contributions made by the participant under
the participation agreement plus the actual program fund investment
income earned on the contributions, less any losses incurred on the
investment, and such distribution will generally not be subject to
federal tax penalty:
(a) Death of the beneficiary if the distribution is paid to the
estate of the beneficiary or transferred to another beneficiary as set
forth in subsection (10) of section 12 of this act 85-1809;
(b) Permanent disability or mental incapacity of the beneficiary;
(c) The beneficiary is awarded a scholarship as defined in section
529 of the Internal Revenue Code, but only to the extent the distribution
of earnings does not exceed the scholarship amount; or
(d) A qualified rollover is made as permitted by section 529 of the
Internal Revenue Code, except that if a qualified rollover is made into a
plan sponsored by another state or entity, the participation agreement
shall be deemed to have been canceled for purposes of subdivision (8)(d)
-28-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
of section 77-2716 and federal adjusted gross income shall be increased
to the extent previously deducted as a contribution to the trust.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, under no
circumstances shall a participant or beneficiary receive a distribution
that is more than the fair market value of the specific account on the
applicable liquidation date.
(4) If a participant cancels a participation agreement, obtains a
rollover into a plan sponsored by another state or entity, or obtains a
distribution, a portion of which constitutes a nonqualified withdrawal,
the amount of the distribution, rollover, or withdrawal will be subject
to recapture of previous Nebraska state income tax deductions as set
forth in subdivision (8)(d) of section 77-2716. The transfer of assets
among plans sponsored by the State of Nebraska shall be considered an
investment option change and not a rollover.
Sec. 12. Section 85-1809, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-1809 (1) A participant retains ownership of all contributions
made under a participation agreement up to the date of utilization for
payment of qualified higher education expenses for the beneficiary or, in
the case of a qualified education loan payment, for the beneficiary or a
sibling of the beneficiary. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
any amount credited to any account is not susceptible to any levy,
execution, judgment, or other operation of law, garnishment, or other
judicial enforcement, and the amount is not an asset or property of
either the participant or the beneficiary for the purposes of any state
insolvency or inheritance tax laws. All income derived from the
investment of the contributions made by the participant shall be
considered to be held in trust for the benefit of the beneficiary.
(2) If the program created by sections 5 85-1801 to 20 of this act
85-1817 is terminated prior to payment of qualified higher education
expenses, the participant is entitled to receive the fair market value of
-29-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
the account established in the program.
(3) If the beneficiary graduates from an eligible postsecondary
educational institution and a balance remains in the participant's
account, any remaining funds may be used to make qualified education loan
payments for siblings of the beneficiary or transferred as allowed by
rule or regulation, subject to the provisions of section 529 of the
Internal Revenue Code, as well as any other applicable state or federal
laws or regulations.
(4) The elementary or secondary school or eligible postsecondary
educational institution shall obtain ownership of the payments made for
the qualified higher education expenses paid to the institution at the
time each payment is made to the institution.
(5) Any amounts which may be paid to any person or persons pursuant
to the Nebraska educational savings plan trust but which are not listed
in this section are owned by the trust.
(6) A participant may transfer ownership rights to another eligible
participant, including a gift of the ownership rights to a minor
beneficiary. The transfer shall be made and the property distributed in
accordance with the rules and regulations or with the terms of the
participation agreement.
(7) A participant shall not be entitled to utilize any interest in
the Nebraska educational savings plan trust as security for a loan.
(8) The Nebraska educational savings plan trust may accept transfers
of cash investments from a custodian under the Nebraska Uniform Transfers
to Minors Act or any other similar laws under the terms and conditions
established by the trustee.
(9) A participant may designate a successor account owner to succeed
to all of the participant's rights, title, and interest in an account,
including the right to change the account beneficiary, upon the death or
legal incapacity of the participant. If a participant dies or becomes
legally incapacitated and has failed to name a successor account owner,
-30-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
the account beneficiary shall become the account owner.
(10) Upon the death of a beneficiary, the participant may change the
beneficiary on the account, transfer assets to another beneficiary who is
a member of the family of the former beneficiary, or request a
nonqualified withdrawal.
Sec. 13. Section 85-1810, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-1810 (1) A student loan program, student grant program, or other
program administered by any agency of the state, except as may be
otherwise provided by federal law or the provisions of any specific grant
applicable to the federal law, shall not take into account and shall not
consider amounts available for the payment of qualified higher education
expenses pursuant to the Nebraska educational savings plan trust in
determining need and eligibility for student aid.
(2) A government program administered by any agency of the state
that provides benefits or aid to individuals based on financial need,
except as may be otherwise provided by federal law or the provisions of
any specific grant applicable to the federal law, shall not take into
account and shall not consider contributions made to a participant's
account by the participant's employer in determining the income of such
participant.
Sec. 14. Section 85-1811, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-1811 (1) The State Treasurer shall submit an annual audited
financial report, prepared in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles, on the operations of the Nebraska educational
savings plan trust by November 1 to the Governor and the Legislature. The
report submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted electronically.
The State Treasurer shall cause the audit to be made either by the
Auditor of Public Accounts or by an independent certified public
accountant designated by the State Treasurer, and the audit shall include
-31-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
direct and indirect costs attributable to the use of outside consultants,
independent contractors, and any other persons who are not state
employees.
(2) The annual audit shall be supplemented by all of the following
information prepared by the State Treasurer:
(a) Any related studies or evaluations prepared in the preceding
year;
(b) A summary of the benefits provided by the trust, including the
number of participants and beneficiaries in the trust; and
(c) Any other information which is relevant in order to make a full,
fair, and effective disclosure of the operations of the trust, including
the investment performance of the funds.
Sec. 15. Section 85-1812, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-1812 (1) For federal income tax purposes, the Nebraska
educational savings plan trust shall be considered a qualified state
tuition program exempt from taxation pursuant to section 529 of the
Internal Revenue Code. The trust meets the requirements of section 529(b)
of the Internal Revenue Code as follows:
(a) Pursuant to section 9 of this act 85-1806, a participant may
make contributions to an account which is established for the purpose of
meeting the qualified higher education expenses of the designated
beneficiary of the account or, in the case of a qualified education loan
payment, the designated beneficiary of the account or a sibling of the
designated beneficiary;
(b) Pursuant to section 9 of this act 85-1806, a maximum
contribution level is established;
(c) Pursuant to section 10 of this act 85-1807, a separate account
is established for each beneficiary;
(d) Pursuant to section 10 of this act 85-1807, contributions may
only be made in the form of cash;
-32-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
(e) Pursuant to section 10 of this act 85-1807, a participant or
beneficiary shall not provide investment direction regarding program
contributions or earnings held by the trust;
(f) Penalties are provided on distributions of earnings which are:
(i) Not used for qualified higher education expenses of the beneficiary
or, in the case of a qualified education loan payment, the beneficiary or
a sibling of the beneficiary; (ii) made on account of the death of the
designated beneficiary if the distribution is not transferred to another
beneficiary or paid to the estate of the beneficiary; (iii) not made on
account of the permanent disability or mental incapacity of the
designated beneficiary; or (iv) made due to scholarship, allowance, or
payment receipt in excess of the scholarship, allowance, or payment
receipt; and
(g) Pursuant to section 12 of this act 85-1809, a participant shall
not pledge any interest in the trust as security for a loan.
(2) State income tax treatment of the Nebraska educational savings
plan trust shall be as provided in section 77-2716.
(3) For purposes of federal gift and generation-skipping transfer
taxes, contributions to an account are considered a completed gift from
the contributor to the beneficiary.
Sec. 16. Section 85-1813, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-1813 The assets of the Nebraska educational savings plan trust,
including the program fund and excluding the administrative fund and the
expense fund, shall at all times be preserved, invested, and expended
solely and only for the purposes of the trust and shall be held in trust
for the participants and beneficiaries. No property rights in the trust
shall exist in favor of the state. Assets of the trust, including the
program fund, the administrative fund, and the expense fund, shall not be
transferred or used by the state for any purposes other than the purposes
of the trust.
-33-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
Sec. 17. Section 85-1814, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-1814 Nothing in sections 5 85-1801 to 16 of this act 85-1813
shall be deemed to prohibit both resident and nonresident participants
and designated beneficiaries from being eligible to participate in and
benefit from the Nebraska educational savings plan trust and program. It
is the intent of the Legislature that funds and income credited to the
program fund are fully portable and may be used at any elementary or
secondary school or eligible postsecondary educational institution.
Sec. 18. Section 85-1815, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-1815 (1) The College Savings Incentive Cash Fund is created. The
fund shall be administered by the State Treasurer and shall be used to
provide incentive payments under the Employer Matching Contribution
Incentive Program established in section 19 of this act 85-1816 and to
provide matching scholarships under the College Savings Plan Low-Income
Matching Scholarship Program established in section 20 of this act
85-1817. The State Treasurer shall accept contributions from any private
individual or private entity and shall credit all such contributions
received to the College Savings Incentive Cash Fund for the purpose of
providing an ongoing source of funding for the College Savings Plan Low-
Income Matching Scholarship Program. The matching contributions for which
incentive payments are made under the Employer Matching Contribution
Incentive Program and the matching scholarships provided under the
College Savings Plan Low-Income Matching Scholarship Program shall not be
used to pay expenses associated with attending kindergarten through grade
twelve.
(2) The College Savings Incentive Cash Fund shall not be considered
an asset of the Nebraska educational savings plan trust.
(3) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
-34-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 19. Section 85-1816, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-1816 (1) The Employer Matching Contribution Incentive Program is
created. The program shall begin on January 1, 2022, and shall be
implemented and administered by the State Treasurer. The purpose of the
program is to encourage employers to make matching contributions by
providing incentive payments for such contributions.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) Employer means any individual, partnership, limited liability
company, association, corporation, business trust, legal representative,
or organized group of persons employing one or more employees at any one
time, but such term does not include the United States, the state, or any
political subdivision thereof; and
(b) Matching contribution means a contribution made by an employer
to an account established under the Nebraska educational savings plan
trust in an amount matching all or part of a contribution made to that
same account by an individual who resided in the State of Nebraska during
the most recently completed taxable year and is an employee of such
employer.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2022, an employer shall be eligible to
receive an incentive payment under this section if the employer made
matching contributions during the immediately preceding calendar year.
(4) In order to receive an incentive payment under this section, an
employer shall submit an application to the State Treasurer on forms
prescribed by the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall accept
applications from January 1 to June 1 of each year beginning in 2022. The
application shall include:
(a) The number of employees for whom matching contributions were
made in the immediately preceding calendar year;
(b) The amount of the matching contributions made in the immediately
-35-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
preceding calendar year for each employee; and
(c) Any other information required by the State Treasurer.
(5) If the State Treasurer determines that the employer qualifies
for an incentive payment under this section, the State Treasurer shall
approve the application and shall notify the employer of the approval.
The State Treasurer may approve applications until the annual limit
provided in subsection (6) of this section has been reached. An employer
whose application is approved shall receive an incentive payment equal to
twenty-five percent of the total matching contributions made during the
immediately preceding calendar year, not to exceed two thousand dollars
per contributing employee per year. An employer shall not receive an
incentive payment for a matching contribution if the employer claimed an
income tax deduction pursuant to subdivision (8)(b) of section 77-2716
for such matching contribution. Employers shall be limited to one
incentive payment per beneficiary. The matching contributions for which
incentive payments are made shall not be used to pay expenses associated
with attending kindergarten through grade twelve.
(6) The State Treasurer may approve a total of two hundred fifty
thousand dollars of incentive payments each calendar year.
(7) On or before June 30, 2022, and on or before June 30 of each
year thereafter, the State Treasurer shall determine the total amount of
incentive payments approved for the year, shall transfer such amount from
the Education College Savings Plan Expense Fund or the Unclaimed Property
Trust Fund, as determined by the State Treasurer, to the College Savings
Incentive Cash Fund, and shall distribute such incentive payments to the
approved employers.
(8) The State Treasurer may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the Employer Matching Contribution Incentive
Program.
Sec. 20. Section 85-1817, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-36-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
85-1817 (1) Beginning January 1, 2022, there is hereby established
the College Savings Plan Low-Income Matching Scholarship Program. The
purpose of the program is to encourage private contributions to accounts
established under the Nebraska educational savings plan trust for the
benefit of individuals with limited means. The State Treasurer shall
implement and administer the program.
(2) A participant shall be eligible for the program if the
beneficiary for whom private contributions are made is part of a family
whose household income for the most recently completed taxable year is
not more than two hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty level and
the beneficiary is a resident of the State of Nebraska.
(3) Applications for participation in the program shall be submitted
to the State Treasurer on forms prescribed by the State Treasurer. If the
requirements of subsection (2) of this section are met, the State
Treasurer shall approve the application and notify the applicant of the
approval. The State Treasurer may approve applications until the annual
limit provided in subsection (7) of this section has been reached.
(4) Any participant who is approved for the program under subsection
(3) of this section must resubmit an application each year thereafter and
be reapproved in order to continue participation in the program.
(5) If a participant is approved for the program, any contribution
made by such participant under the program shall be matched with
scholarship funds provided by the State of Nebraska. The matching
scholarship shall be equal to:
(a) One hundred percent of the participant's contribution if the
beneficiary for whom the contribution is made is part of a family whose
household income for the most recently completed taxable year is more
than two hundred percent of the federal poverty level but not more than
two hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty level, not to exceed one
thousand dollars annually; or
(b) Two hundred percent of the participant's contribution if the
-37-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
beneficiary for whom the contribution is made is part of a family whose
household income for the most recently completed taxable year is not more
than two hundred percent of the federal poverty level, not to exceed one
thousand dollars annually.
(6) Between January 1 and January 31 of each year, the State
Treasurer shall transfer the amount necessary to meet the matching
obligations of this section for the preceding calendar year, minus the
amount of any private contributions received pursuant to subsection (1)
of section 18 of this act 85-1815 during the preceding calendar year,
from the Education College Savings Plan Expense Fund or the Unclaimed
Property Trust Fund, as determined by the State Treasurer, to the College
Savings Incentive Cash Fund. The State Treasurer shall transfer from the
College Savings Incentive Cash Fund to the Education College Savings Plan
Program Fund the amount necessary to meet the matching obligations of
this section for the preceding calendar year. The Nebraska educational
savings plan trust shall own all scholarships awarded under this section.
Neither the participant nor the beneficiary shall have any ownership
rights to or interest in, title to, or power or control over such
scholarships. Scholarship funds disbursed shall only be used to pay the
qualified higher education expenses associated with attending an eligible
postsecondary educational institution located in this state and shall not
be used to pay expenses associated with attending kindergarten through
grade twelve. Any disbursement of such scholarships shall be made before
the beneficiary reaches thirty years of age. Once the beneficiary reaches
thirty years of age, any unused scholarship funds shall be transferred to
the Meadowlark Endowment Fund.
(7) The State Treasurer may approve a total of two hundred fifty
thousand dollars of scholarships each calendar year under the College
Savings Plan Low-Income Matching Scholarship Program.
Sec. 21. Section 85-2802, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-38-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
85-2802 For purposes of the Meadowlark Act:
(1) Contribution means a donation which is made for the purpose of
providing a source of funding for the Meadowlark Program established in
section 85-2804;
(2) Eligible postsecondary educational institution has the same
meaning as in section 6 of this act 85-1802;
(3) Nebraska educational savings plan trust has the same meaning as
in section 6 of this act 85-1802;
(4) Qualified higher education expenses has the same meaning as in
section 6 of this act 85-1802; and
(5) Qualified individual means an individual born on or after
January 1, 2020, who is a resident of this state at the time of birth.
Sec. 22. Section 85-2803, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-2803 (1) There is hereby established in the state treasury a
trust fund to be known as the Meadowlark Endowment Fund. The fund shall
be administered by the State Treasurer and shall consist of qualified
private contributions and any amounts appropriated or transferred to the
fund by the Legislature. No General Funds shall be transferred to the
Meadowlark Endowment Fund. Any money in the fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act. No portion of the principal of the fund shall be expended for any
purpose except investment pursuant to this subsection.
(2) The State Treasurer may accept contributions and shall credit
all such contributions received either to the Meadowlark Endowment Fund
or to accounts opened under the Meadowlark Program, at the direction of
the donor. Such contributions shall not be used to pay expenses
associated with attending kindergarten through grade twelve.
(3) On or before April 1 of each year, the State Treasurer shall
determine the total amount of contributions received under subsection (2)
-39-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
of this section in the previous calendar year and shall transfer an equal
amount from the Education College Savings Plan Expense Fund or the
Unclaimed Property Trust Fund, as determined by the State Treasurer, to
the Meadowlark Endowment Fund or to accounts opened under the Meadowlark
Program. For any amount transferred from the Education College Savings
Plan Expense Fund or the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund that is not being
transferred to the Meadowlark Endowment Fund, the State Treasurer shall
evenly distribute such amount to the accounts opened under the Meadowlark
Program in the previous calendar year.
Sec. 23. Section 85-2804, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-2804 (1) The Meadowlark Program is created. The program shall be
administered by the State Treasurer. The purpose of the program is to
promote access to postsecondary educational opportunities by providing
funds to qualified individuals to help pay the qualified higher education
expenses associated with attendance at an eligible postsecondary
educational institution located in this state.
(2) Any qualified individual shall be eligible to participate in the
Meadowlark Program. No later than March 1 of each year, the Department of
Health and Human Services shall transmit information to the State
Treasurer which is necessary to administer the program and to establish
whether the children born in the previous calendar year are qualified
individuals. Such information shall include, but not be limited to, the
full name and residential address of each child's parent or legal
guardian and the birthdate of each child. Costs associated with the
transfer of information by the Department of Health and Human Services
shall be paid from the Education College Savings Plan Expense Fund.
(3) Following receipt of the information described in subsection (2)
of this section, the State Treasurer shall send a notification explaining
the Meadowlark Program to the parent or legal guardian of each qualified
individual. The State Treasurer shall provide such parent or legal
-40-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
guardian with the opportunity to exclude his or her child from the
program. Any child who is not excluded shall be deemed to be enrolled in
the program. Upon enrollment into the program, the child shall have an
account opened for him or her under the Nebraska educational savings plan
trust.
(4) On or before April 1 of each year, the State Treasurer shall
determine (a) the number of accounts opened under the Meadowlark Program
in the previous calendar year and (b) the amount of investment income
generated by the Meadowlark Endowment Fund in the previous calendar year.
The State Treasurer shall evenly distribute the investment income from
the previous calendar year to the accounts opened in the previous
calendar year.
(5) The Nebraska educational savings plan trust shall own all
accounts opened under the Meadowlark Program. Neither the qualified
individual nor his or her parent or legal guardian shall have any
ownership rights or interest in, title to, or power or control over such
an account.
(6) Any disbursement from an account opened under the Meadowlark
Program shall be made before the qualified individual reaches thirty
years of age. Once a qualified individual reaches thirty years of age,
any unused funds in his or her account shall be transferred to the
Meadowlark Endowment Fund.
(7) Funds disbursed from an account opened under the Meadowlark
Program shall only be used to pay the qualified higher education expenses
associated with attending an eligible postsecondary educational
institution located in this state and shall not be used to pay expenses
associated with attending kindergarten through grade twelve.
(8) The State Treasurer shall take measures to ensure the security
and confidentiality of the information received under subsection (2) of
this section.
Sec. 24. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
-41-

LB131 LB131
2025 2025
Sec. 25. Original sections 85-1801, 85-1802, 85-1804, 85-1805,
85-1806, 85-1807, 85-1808, 85-1809, 85-1810, 85-1811, 85-1812, 85-1813,
85-1814, 85-1815, 85-1816, 85-1817, 85-2802, 85-2803, and 85-2804,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 68-1201, 72-1239.01,
77-3,110, and 77-2716, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are
repealed.
-42-